Florida, session 2026, HB659.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 501.172, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
501.172 Companion chatbots.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "AI-generated" means any image, video, or audio that
is generated or modified by artificial intelligence which may
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb659-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 659 2026
portray realistic human likenesses or depictions.
(b) "Companion chatbot" means an artificial intelligence
system with a natural language interface that provides adaptive,
human-like responses to user inputs and is capable of meeting a
user's social needs, including by exhibiting anthropomorphic
features and being able to sustain a relationship across
multiple interactions. The term does not include:
1. A bot used only for customer service, business
operational purposes, or productivity and analysis related to
source information, internal research, or technical assistance;
2. A bot that is a feature of a video game and is limited
to replies related to the video game and that cannot discuss
topics related to mental health, self-harm, sexually explicit
conduct, or maintain a dialogue on other topics unrelated to the
video game; or
3. A stand-alone consumer electronic device that functions
as a speaker and voice command interface, acts as a voice-
activated virtual assistant, and does not sustain a relationship
across multiple interactions or generate outputs that are likely
to elicit emotional responses in the user.
(c) "Operator" means a person who makes a companion
chatbot platform available to a user in this state.
(d) "Sexually explicit conduct" means actual or simulated
sexual intercourse, bestiality, masturbation, sadistic or
masochistic abuse, or lascivious exhibition of the genitals or
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb659-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 659 2026
pubic area.
(2) An operator shall clearly and conspicuously display
the following notice on any application, browser, or other
format used to access companion chatbots on the operator's
platform: "Companion chatbots are AI-generated and not human.
Companion chatbots may not be suitable for some minors."
(3)(a) An operator shall prevent a companion chatbot on
the platform from interacting with users unless the operator
maintains a protocol to prevent the production of suicidal
ideation, suicide, or self-harm content.
(b) At a minimum, the protocol must include a notification
that refers the user to the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline call
center if the user expresses suicidal ideation, or intent to
commit suicide or to self-harm.
(c) The protocol must include mechanisms to:
1. Detect, remove, and respond to expressions of suicidal
ideation, or intent to commit suicide or to self-harm by users.
2. Prohibit a companion chatbot from discussing suicidal
ideation, suicide, or self-harm with users.
3. Measure suicidal ideation by using evidence-based
methods.
(d) The operator shall publish the protocol on the
platform.
(4)(a) An operator must offer anonymous age verification
and standard age verification pursuant to s. 501.1737 for user
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb659-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 659 2026
access to a companion chatbot on the platform.
(b) For a user the operator knows is a minor, the operator
shall do all of the following:
1. Disclose to the user that he or she is interacting with
artificial intelligence.
2. Provide a clear and conspicuous default notification at
least every 3 hours for continuing companion chatbot
interactions reminding the user to take a break from the
interaction and that the companion chatbot is AI-generated and
not human.
3. Implement reasonable measures to prevent a companion
chatbot from producing visual material of sexually explicit
conduct or directly stating that the user should engage in
sexually explicit conduct.
(5)(a) Beginning July 1, 2027, each operator shall submit
to the Department of Legal Affairs an annual report that
includes all of the following:
1. The number of times in the preceding calendar year the
operator has issued a 988 suicide and crisis lifeline call
center referral notification.
2. The protocol for detecting, removing, and responding to
expressions of suicidal ideation, or intent to committee suicide
or to self-harm by users.
3. The protocol for prohibiting a companion chatbot from
100 discussing suicidal ideation, suicide, or self-harm with users.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb659-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 659 2026
101 (b) The report may not include any identifiers or personal
102 information about users.
103 (6) A violation of this section constitutes an unfair or
104 deceptive act or practice as specified in s. 501.204 and shall
105 be enforced by civil action by the Attorney General. The
106 Department of Legal Affairs must notify the operator of any
107 suspected violation and allow the operator 30 calendar days to
108 cure the alleged violation before initiating enforcement action.
109 This section does not create a private right of action.
110 (7) This section does not relieve an operator from any
111 duties, remedies, or obligations imposed by any other law.
112 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb659-00